Illinois, session 104th, SB2299.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Architectural, Engineering, and Land 5Surveying Qualifications Based Selection Act is amended by 6changing Section 45 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 535/45)  (from Ch. 127, par. 4151-45)8    Sec. 45. Small contracts. The provisions of Sections 25, 930, and 35 do not apply to architectural, engineering, and 10land surveying contracts with an estimated basic professional 11services fee of less than $55,000 $25,000.12(Source: P.A. 92-861, eff. 1-3-03.)